Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1844.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.06, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Approval of cannabis flower and products. (a) For the purposes of this section, "product category" means a type of product that may be sold in different sizes, distinct packaging, or at various prices but is still created using the same manufacturing or agricultural processes. A new or additional stock keeping unit (SKU) or Universal Product Code (UPC) shall not prevent a product from being considered the same type as another unit. All other terms have the meanings provided in section 342.01. (b) The office shall approve product categories of cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products for retail sale. (c) The office may establish limits on the total THC of cannabis flower, cannabis products, and hemp-derived consumer products. As used in this paragraph, "total THC" means the sum of the percentage by weight of tetrahydrocannabinolic acid multiplied by 0.877 plus the percentage by weight of all tetrahydrocannabinols. (d) The office shall not approve any cannabis product, lower-potency hemp edible, or hemp-derived consumer product that: (1) is or appears to be a lollipop or ice cream; (2) bears the likeness or contains characteristics of a real or fictional person, animal, or fruit; (3) is modeled after a type or brand of products primarily consumed by or marketed to children; (4) is substantively similar to a meat food product; poultry food product as defined in section 31A.02, subdivision 10; or a dairy product as defined in section 32D.01, subdivision 7; (5) contains a synthetic cannabinoid; (6) is made by applying a cannabinoid, including but not limited to an artificially derived cannabinoid, to a finished food product that does not contain cannabinoids and is sold to consumers, including but not limited to a candy or snack food; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (7) if the product is an edible cannabis product or lower-potency hemp edible, contains an ingredient, other than a cannabinoid, that is not approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for use in fooddeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (8) if the product is an inhaled natural or synthetic product, contains an added flavor such as fruit, mint, menthol, vanilla, chocolate, spice, or another common food flavor; or new text end new text begin (9) has images or language that could lead consumers to believe that the product has a flavor other than the flavor of cannabis. new text end